District of Columbia statutes.
32-801

Purpose of subchapter.

The purpose of this subchapter is to foster, promote, and develop the safety of wage earners of the District of Columbia in relation to their working conditions.

Sept. 19, 1918, ch. 174, title II, § 1
Oct. 14, 1941, 55 Stat. 738, ch. 438,§ 3
1981 Ed., § 36-221.
1973 Ed., § 36-431.
Repeal of chapter: Section 25 of D.C. Law 7-186 repeals subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 36 Chapter 8 of Title 32, 2001 Ed.. Section 26(a) ( D.C. Code, 32-1124(a)) provided that §§ 36-1202, 36-1203, 36-1205 to 36-1223 (§§ 32-1102, 32-1103, 32-1105 to 32-1123, 2001 Ed.), and the repeal of subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 36 (Chapter 8 of Title 32, 2001 Ed.) shall apply 2 years after approval of the plan by the Secretary.